ko: 포커 액세서리 보관 공간 포함: 블라인드 버튼; 칩 키; 칩 전용; 컷 카드; 딜러 버튼; 주사위; 혼합 액세서리; 플레잉 카드; 기타
zh-CN: 扑克配件收纳配置: 盲注按钮; 筹码箱钥匙; 仅含筹码; 切牌卡; 庄家按钮; 骰子; 混合配件; 扑克牌; 其他
fi: Mukana tuleva pokeritarvikkeiden säilytystila: Blind-napit; Pelimerkkiavain; Vain pelimerkit; Leikkuukortti; Jakajan nappi; Nopat; Sekalaiset tarvikkeet; Pelikortit; Muu
nb: Oppbevaring av pokertilbehør inkludert: Blind-knapper; Sjetongnøkkel; Kun sjetonger; Kuttekort; Dealer-knapp; Terninger; Blandet tilbehør; Spillkort; Annet
de: Enthaltener Stauraum für Pokerzubehör: Blind-Buttons; Chip-Schlüssel; Nur Chips; Cut-Card; Dealer-Button; Würfel; Gemischtes Zubehör; Spielkarten; Sonstige
sk-SK: Úložný priestor pre pokerové príslušenstvo súčasťou balenia: Žetóny blind; Kľúč k boxu so žetónmi; Len žetóny; Oddeľovacia karta; Žetón krupiéra; Kocky; Zmiešané príslušenstvo; Hracie karty; Iné
it: Vano porta accessori per poker incluso: Bottoni per bui; Chiave per fiches; Solo fiches; Carta taglia mazzo; Bottone del dealer; Dadi; Accessori misti; Carte da gioco; Altro
zh-TW: 撲克配件隨附收納: 盲注按鈕; 籌碼鑰匙; 僅籌碼; 切牌卡; 莊家按鈕; 骰子; 混合配件; 撲克牌; 其他
fr: Rangement inclus pour le matériel de poker: Boutons de blind; Clé à jetons; Jetons uniquement; Carte de coupe; Bouton de donneur; Dés; Accessoires mixtes; Cartes à jouer; Autre
hr-HR: Uključen prostor za pohranu poker pribora: Blind žetoni; Ključ za žetone; Samo žetoni; Cut kartica; Dealer žeton; Kockice; Miješani dodaci; Igraće karte; Ostalo
vi: Bao gồm hộp đựng phụ kiện chơi bài poker: Nút cược mù (Blind); Chìa khóa hộp chip; Chỉ có chip; Thẻ cắt bài; Nút nhà cái (Dealer); Xúc xắc; Phụ kiện hỗn hợp; Bộ bài; Khác
en: Poker accessory storage included: Blind buttons; Chip key; Chips only; Cut card; Dealer button; Dice; Mixed accessories; Playing cards; Other
cs: Úložný prostor pro pokerové příslušenství je součástí balení: Žetony povinných sázek (blinds); Klíč na žetony; Pouze žetony; Snímací karta (cut card); Žeton rozdávajícího (dealer button); Kostky; Smíšené příslušenství; Hrací karty; Jiné
el: Αποθηκευτικός χώρος για αξεσουάρ πόκερ που περιλαμβάνεται: Κουμπιά blind; Κλειδί μάρκας; Μόνο μάρκες; Κάρτα κοπής; Κουμπί ντίλερ; Ζάρια; Διάφορα αξεσουάρ; Τράπουλες; Άλλο
nl: Pokeraccessoire meegeleverde opslag: Blind-buttons; Fiche-sleutel; Alleen fiches; Cut card; Dealer-button; Dobbelstenen; Gemengde accessoires; Speelkaarten; Overig
es: Almacenamiento para guardar accesorios de póker incluido: Botones de ciega; Llave de fichas; Solo fichas; Tarjeta de corte; Botón de repartidor; Dados; Accesorios mixtos; Naipes; Otro
pt-PT: Arrumação para acessórios de poker incluído: Botões de blind; Chave de fichas; Apenas fichas; Carta de corte; Botão de dealer; Dados; Acessórios mistos; Cartas de jogar; Outros
ro-RO: Depozitare inclusă pentru accesorii de poker: Butoane pentru blind-uri; Cheie pentru jetoane; Doar jetoane; Card de tăiere; Buton dealer; Zaruri; Accesorii mixte; Cărți de joc; Altele
hu: Pókerkiegészítők mellékelt tárolója: Vakgombok; Zsetonkészlet-kulcs; Csak zsetonok; Vágókártya; Osztógomb; Dobókockák; Vegyes kiegészítők; Játékkártyák; Egyéb
pt-BR: Acessório de pôquer armazenamento incluído: Botões de blind; Chave para fichas; Apenas fichas; Carta de corte; Botão de dealer; Dados; Acessórios mistos; Cartas de baralho; Outro
sv: Ingående förvaring för pokertillbehör: Blind-knappar; Markernyckel; Endast marker; Kuperingskort; Dealer-knapp; Tärningar; Blandade tillbehör; Spelkort; Övrigt
ru: Наличие хранения аксессуаров для покера: Фишки блайндов; Ключ для фишек; Только фишки; Подрезная карта; Фишка дилера; Кубики; Смешанные аксессуары; Игральные карты; Другое
lt-LT: Įtrauktos pokerio priedų laikymo vietos: „Blind“ žetonai; Žetonų raktas; Tik žetonai; Padalijimo korta; Dalytojo žetonas; Kauliukai; Įvairūs priedai; Žaidimo kortos; Kita
th: มีช่องเก็บอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเล่นโป๊กเกอร์: ปุ่ม Blind; กุญแจชิป; ชิปเท่านั้น; การ์ดตัด; ปุ่ม Dealer; ลูกเต๋า; อุปกรณ์เสริมแบบผสม; ไพ่; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Включено място за съхранение на покер аксесоари: Блайнд бутони; Ключ за чипове; Само чипове; Карта за цепене; Дилърски бутон; Зарове; Смесени аксесоари; Карти за игра; Други
da: Medfølgende opbevaring til pokertilbehør: Blind-knapper; Nøgle til jetoner; Kun jetoner; Cut card; Dealer-knap; Terninger; Blandet tilbehør; Spillekort; Andet
sl-SI: Vključeno shranjevanje dodatkov za poker: Gumbi »blind«; Ključ za žetone; Samo žetoni; Rezalna karta; Gumb delivca; Kocke; Mešani dodatki; Igralne karte; Drugo
ja: ポーカー用アクセサリー収納付き: ブラインドボタン; チップキー; チップのみ; カットカード; ディーラーボタン; ダイス; 混合アクセサリー; トランプ; その他
pl: Dołączone przechowywanie akcesoriów pokerowych: Znaczniki w ciemno (blind); Klucz do żetonów; Tylko żetony; Karta do cięcia; Znacznik krupiera (dealer); Kości; Różne akcesoria; Karty do gry; Inne
tr: Dahil olan poker aksesuarları saklama alanı: Kör bahis butonları; Fiş anahtarı; Sadece fişler; Kesme kartı; Dağıtıcı butonu; Zarlar; Karışık aksesuarlar; Oyun kartları; Diğer